Louisiana, session 2026, HB548.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:74(B)(1), (H)(2), and (J)(7), 75(G), 76(A)(1), (C)(1)(introductory
paragraph) and (2), (G)(introductory paragraph) and (3), and 94(A)(1) and (2) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§74. State Board of Certified Public Accountants of Louisiana; powers and duties
* * *
B.(1) The board shall consist of seven members appointed by the governor,
all of whom shall be residents of this state and holders of valid licenses. Board
members shall be selected from diverse practice and professional areas, including but
not limited to tax, audit, and education. Each appointment shall be made from a list
of three or more names submitted to the governor by the Society of Louisiana
Certified Public Accountants or its successor.
* * *
H.
* * *
(2) The board shall have has the power to issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, to administer oaths, to take
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 548 ENROLLED
testimony, and receive evidence concerning all matters within the scope of this Part,
and to cooperate with the appropriate state and federal regulatory authorities having
jurisdiction over the conduct in question in investigation and enforcement concerning
violations of this Part and comparable acts of other states. The board shall have has
the power to cooperate in enforcement with appropriate foreign regulatory
authorities, which grant substantially equivalent comparable foreign designations
under R.S. 37:76(G), in instances which have or may result in criminal conviction,
loss of license or suspension, admonishment or censure.
* * *
J. The board may adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, governing its administration and enforcement of the provisions of this
Part and the conduct of holders of a certificate, license, or permit including but not
limited to rules governing:
* * *
(7) Substantial equivalency Mobility practice privileges.
* * *
§75. Qualifications for a certificate as a certified public accountant
* * *
G.(1)(a) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall show that he has completed at least one of the
following educational pathways:
(i) one hundred fifty semester hours of college education including a A
baccalaureate or higher degree plus an additional thirty semester hours conferred by
a college or university acceptable to the board, the total educational program to
include an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by the board to be
appropriate.
(ii) A post-baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or
university acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an
accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by the board to be appropriate.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 548 ENROLLED
(iii) A baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university
acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an accounting
concentration or equivalent as determined by the board to be appropriate.
(b) The applicant shall meet all education requirements complete one of the
educational pathways in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph by December thirty-first
of the fifth calendar year following successful completion of the examination, or the
examination scores will be voided. The board may grant additional time to complete
the requirements requirement as provided in this Section when an applicant can
demonstrate circumstances of extreme hardship.
(2)(a) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall show that he has completed one year of experience
before the applicant is issued a certificate on the basis of the educational pathways
in Items (a)(i) or (ii) of this Subsection, or two years of experience before the
applicant is issued a certificate on the basis of the educational pathway in Item
(a)(iii) of this Subsection.
(b) Such experience shall include providing any type of service or advice
involving the use of accounting, attest, management advisory, financial advisory, tax,
or consulting skills. All such experience shall be obtained within the four-year
period preceding the board's receipt of the application and be verified by a licensee.
Experience gained through employment in government, industry, academia, or public
practice is acceptable.
* * *
§76. Issuance and renewal of certificates and maintenance of competency
A.(1) The board shall grant or renew certificates to persons who make
application to the board and demonstrate that their qualifications are in accordance
with the provisions of this Part or that they are eligible under the substantial
equivalency mobility standard prescribed in this Part.
* * *
C.(1) For those applicants who do not qualify for reciprocity under the
substantial equivalency mobility standard provided for in this Part, the board shall
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 548 ENROLLED
issue a certificate to a holder of an active certificate, license, or permit issued by
another state upon a showing that:
* * *
(2) As an alternative to the requirements of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
an active certificate holder licensed by another state who desires to establish his
principal place of business in this state shall request the issuance of a certificate from
the board prior to establishing such principal place of business. The board shall issue
an active certificate to such that person whose CPA qualifications are substantially
equivalent comparable to the CPA licensure requirements of this Part as determined
by the board or its designee.
* * *
G. The board may issue a certificate to a holder of a substantially equivalent
comparable foreign designation provided that:
* * *
(3) The applicant:
(a) Received the designation based upon educational and examination
standards substantially equivalent comparable to those in effect in this state at the
time the foreign designation was granted.
(b) Completed an experience requirement substantially equivalent
comparable to the requirement provided for in R.S. 37:75 in the jurisdiction which
granted the foreign designation, or has completed four years of professional
experience in this state, or meets equivalent requirements prescribed by the board
within the ten years immediately preceding the application.
* * *
§94. Substantial equivalency Mobility practice privileges
A.(1) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and
who holds a valid active license as a certified public accountant in good standing
from any state which the board or its designee has verified to be in substantial
equivalence with the licensure requirements of this Part shall be presumed to have
qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements and shall have has
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 548 ENROLLED
all the privileges of active licensees of this state without the need to obtain a license
as provided in this Part. However, such individuals shall notify the board of their
intent to offer or render professional services under this Section and pay any fee
required by the board. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board, in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, may adopt a rule allowing an
individual who offers or renders professional services, whether in person, by mail,
telephone, or electronic means, under this Section to be granted practice privileges
in this state without giving notice to the board or paying any fee. Such an individual
shall be subject to the requirements of Paragraph (3) of this Subsection. or otherwise
notify or register with the board or pay any fee, if at the time of initial licensure, the
individual was required to show evidence of having passed the uniform CPA
examination and having met one of the following requirements:
(a) A baccalaureate or higher degree plus an additional thirty semester hours
conferred by a college or university, the total educational program to include an
accounting concentration or equivalent, and not less than one year of experience,
both as defined by board rule.
(b) A post-baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or
university, the total educational program to include an accounting concentration or
equivalent, and not less than one year of experience, both as defined by board rule.
(c) A baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university, the
total educational program to include an accounting concentration or equivalent, and
not less than two years of experience, both as defined by board rule.
(2) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and
who holds a valid active license as a certified public accountant in good standing
from any state as of December 31, 2024, and who, as of that date, had practice
privileges in this state in accordance with this Section, which the board or its
designee has not verified to be in substantial equivalence with the licensure
requirements of this Part shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially
equivalent to this state's requirements and shall continue to have all the privileges of
active licensees of this state without the need to obtain a license required by this Part
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 548 ENROLLED
or to otherwise notify or register with the board or pay any fee, if such individual
verifies that such individual's CPA qualifications are substantially equivalent to the
CPA licensure requirements required by this Part. However, such individuals shall
notify the board of their intent to offer or render professional services and exercise
the privilege afforded by this Section and pay any fee required by the board.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, may adopt a rule allowing an individual who offers
or renders professional services, whether in person, by mail, telephone, or electronic
means, under this Section to be granted practice privileges in this state without
giving notice to the board or paying any fee. Such an individual shall be subject to
the requirements of Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37:73(19) and 74.1(3) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.